Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5775YH (7) 91 sb/js H.F. 2472 Section 1. Section 481A.130, subsection 1, paragraph e, 1 Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 e. For each beaver, bobcat, mink, otter, red fox, or gray 3 fox, or raccoon, two hundred dollars. 4 Sec. 2. Section 481A.130, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 5 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . k. For each raccoon, fifteen dollars. 7 Sec. 3. Section 483A.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 483A.5 Fur harvester license. 10 1. A fur harvester license is required to hunt and to trap 11 any fur-bearing animal. A hunting license is not required when 12 hunting furbearers with a fur harvester license or field trial 13 permit . However, coyote and groundhog may be hunted with a 14 hunting or a fur harvester license. 15 2. The department shall not restrict the time of the year 16 when a person with a valid fur harvester license or field trial 17 permit may hunt raccoons on public land. 18 Sec. 4. Section 805.8B, subsection 3, paragraph f, 19 subparagraph (5), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 (5) (a) For raccoons, the scheduled fine is fifteen 21 dollars. 22 (b) For all other fur-bearing animals, the scheduled fine 23 is one hundred dollars. 24 Sec. 5. Section 805.8B, subsection 3, paragraph g, 25 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 26 (1) (a) For raccoons, the scheduled fine is fifteen 27 dollars. 28 (b) For all other game or fur-bearing animals, the scheduled 29 fine is seventy dollars. 30 Sec. 6. Section 805.8B, subsection 3, paragraph l, Code 31 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 32 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (1A) For raccoons, the scheduled fine is 33 fifteen dollars. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -1- LSB 5775YH (7) 91 sb/js 1/ 2 H.F. 2472 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill relates to raccoons, including restrictions on 3 taking, reimbursement requirements, and scheduled fine amounts. 4 The bill provides that a hunting license is not required when 5 hunting furbearers with a field trial permit, consistent with 6 other current Code provisions. 7 The bill prohibits the department of natural resources from 8 restricting the time of the year when a person with a valid fur 9 harvester license or field trial permit may hunt raccoons on 10 public land. 11 Under current law, a person convicted of unlawfully selling, 12 taking, catching, killing, injuring, destroying, or having in 13 possession a raccoon must reimburse the state $200. The bill 14 decreases the reimbursement to $15. 15 The bill reduces all scheduled fines relating to the taking, 16 pursuing, killing, injuring, destroying, trapping or ensnaring, 17 buying, selling, possessing, or transporting of raccoons to 18 $15. 19 -2- LSB 5775YH (7) 91 sb/js 2/ 2